Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.220

Transfer to system—Prior service credit.

(1) Any member of the Washington public employees' retirement system who is eligible to participate in the judicial retirement system may, by written request filed with the retirement boards of the two systems respectively, transfer such membership to the judicial retirement system. Upon the receipt of such request, the board of the Washington public employees' retirement system shall transfer to the board of the Washington judicial retirement system (a) all employee's contributions and interest thereon belonging to such member in the employees' savings fund and all employer's contributions credited or attributed to such member in the benefit account fund and (b) a record of service credited to such member. One-half of such service shall be computed and not more than nine years shall be credited to such member as though such service was performed as a member of the judicial retirement system. Upon such transfer being made the state treasurer shall deposit such moneys in the judicial retirement fund. In the event that any such member should terminate judicial service prior to his or her entitlement to retirement benefits under any of the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall upon request therefor be repaid from the judicial retirement fund an amount equal to the amount of his or her employee's contributions to the Washington public employees' retirement system and interest plus interest thereon from the date of the transfer of such moneys.

(2) Any member of the judicial retirement system who was formerly a member of the Washington public employees' retirement system with membership service credit of not less than six years but who has terminated his or her membership therein under the provisions of chapter 41.40 RCW, may reinstate his or her membership in the Washington public employees' retirement system, for the sole purpose of qualifying for a transfer of membership in the judicial retirement system in accordance with subsection (1) of this section by making full restoration of all withdrawn funds to the employees' savings fund prior to July 1, 1980. Upon reinstatement in accordance with this subsection, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and the provisions of RCW 41.40.023(3) shall then be applicable to the reinstated member in the same manner and to the same extent as they are to the present members of the Washington public employees' retirement system who are eligible to participate in the judicial retirement system.

(3) Any member of the judicial retirement system who has served as a judge for one or more years and who has rendered service for the state of Washington, or any political subdivision thereof, prior to October 1, 1947, or the time of the admission of the employer into the Washington public employees' retirement system, may—upon his or her payment into the judicial retirement fund of a sum equal to five percent of his or her compensation earned for such prior public service—request and shall be entitled to have one-half of such service computed and not more than six years immediately credited to such member as though such service had been performed as a member of the judicial retirement system, provided that any such prior service so credited shall not be claimed for any pension system other than a judicial retirement system.

[ 2011 c 336 s 28; 1980 c 7 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 22.]

NOTES:

Transfers to system by those covered under chapter 2.12 RCW: RCW 2.10.040.